Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-103
Sections; property to which applicable.

Any possessory or future interest, power of appointment or of revocation, which can be created in this state with regard to land, can also be created with regard to anything other than land, including choses in action.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 3, p. 595;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1003;

R.S.1943, § 76-103.